Massachusetts, session 194th, H3507.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6B of Chapter 159B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 3, after the words “motor vehicles”, the
following words:- or any commercially registered vehicle not requiring a CDL license.
SECTION 2. Said section 6B of said chapter 159B, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 14, after the word “persons”, the following words:- or any
commercially registered vehicle not requiring a CDL license.
of 1